test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-cijkko_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - cijkko: # o-stems
    cijkko+N+Sg+Nom: cijkko
    cijkko+N+Sg+Gen: ciˊjho
    cijkko+N+Sg+Ill: ciijkon
    cijkko+N+Sg+Loc: cijhoost
    cijkko+N+Sg+Com: cijhhoin
    cijkko+N+Ess: cijkkon
    cijkko+N+Par: cijkkod
    cijkko+N+Pl+Nom: ciˊjhoh
    cijkko+N+Pl+Gen: ciˊjhoi
    cijkko+N+Pl+Acc: cijhoid
    cijkko+N+Pl+Ill: cijhhoid
    cijkko+N+Pl+Loc: ciˊjhoin
    cijkko+N+Pl+Com: ciˊjhoiguin
    cijkko+N+Pl+Abe: ciˊjhoittáá
